Washington statutes.
RCW 43.80.125

Appointment of state fiscal agents in connection with registered bonds—Contracting of services.

The state treasurer or the treasurer of a local government may appoint a state fiscal agent to act as registrar, authenticating agent, transfer agent, paying agent, or other agent in connection with the issuance by the state or local government of registered bonds or other obligations pursuant to a system of registration as provided by RCW 39.46.030.

[ 2016 c 105 s 3; 1995 c 38 s 10; 1994 c 301 s 14; 1985 c 84 s 3; 1983 c 167 s 11.]

NOTES:

Acts of municipal officers ratified and confirmed—1995 c 38: See note following RCW 3.02.045.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.